Utah statutes.
19-5-109.   Grounds for revocation, modification, or suspension of discharge permit.

(1)  Any permit issued under this chapter may be revoked, modified, or suspended in whole or in part for cause including:

(a)  violation of any condition of the permit;

(b)  obtaining a permit by misrepresentation or failure to disclose fully all relevant facts; or

(c)  change in any condition that requires either a temporary or permanent reduction or elimination of the permitted discharge.

(2)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(c), "condition" does not include statutory or regulatory effluent limitations enacted or adopted during the permit term, other than for toxic pollutants.

